New York, session 2025-2026, A10996.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 5 of chapter 259 of the laws of 2004, constituting 2 the Coordinated Construction Act for Lower Manhattan, as amended by 3 chapter 628 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed December 31, [2026] 2029. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15157-01-6